Washington statutes.
RCW 43.17.350

Health-related state agencies—Professional health services—Fee schedules.

For the purpose of accurately describing professional health services purchased by the state, health-related state agencies may develop fee schedules based on billing codes and service descriptions published by the American medical association or the United States federal health care financing administration, or develop agency unique codes and service descriptions.

[ 1995 1st sp.s. c 6 s 20.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1995 1st sp.s. c 6: See note following RCW 28A.400.410.